src/morphology/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON PXSG2_Od
000@U.PX.SG2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>od@U.PX.SG2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
000@U.PX.SG2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^Ö2d@U.PX.SG2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXSG3_jA
0000@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ja%^V2VV@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
0000@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>je%^V2VV@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
LEXICON PXSG3_A
000@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>a%^V2VV@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
0000@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>e%^V2VV@U.PX.SG3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXPL1_Unk
0000@U.PX.PL1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>unk@U.PX.PL1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
0000@U.PX.PL1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ünk@U.PX.PL1@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXPL2_OtOk
00000@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>otok@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
00000@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^Ö2t%^Ö2k@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON PXPL3_k
00@U.PX.PL3@:%>k@U.PX.PL3@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
LEXICON PXPL3_jUk
0000@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>juk@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
0000@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>jük@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
LEXICON PXPL3_Uk
000@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>uk@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
000@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ük@U.PX.PL3@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON NOUN_FOR-POSSESSA-PLURAL_
00@U.PX.SG1@:%>m@U.PX.SG1@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
00@U.PX.SG2@:%>d@U.PX.SG2@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
@U.PX.SG3@:@U.PX.SG3@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
0000@U.PX.PL1@:%>nk@U.PX.PL1@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
0000@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>tok@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
0000@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>t%^Ö2k@U.PX.PL2@@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;
00@U.PX.PL3@:%>k@U.PX.PL3@ ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_ ;

LEXICON ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_WHEN-ABS
 NOUN_CASE-MINUS-ACCUSATIVE ;
 ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_01 ;

LEXICON ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_
 NOUN_CASE ;
 ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_01 ;
LEXICON ASSOCIATIVE-POSSESSION-FOR-NOUN_01
+Der/Poss_N+Sg:%>é NOUN_CASE ;
+Der/Poss_N+Pl:%>é%>i NOUN_CASE ;

LEXICON NOUN_CASE
+Acc000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>at@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Acc000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>et@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
 NOUN_CASE-MINUS-ACCUSATIVE ;
LEXICON NOUN_CASE-MINUS-ACCUSATIVE
+Abl000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>tól@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Abl000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>től@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ade000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>nál@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ade000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>nél@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+All000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>hoz@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+All000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>h%^Ö2z@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Cau:%>ért NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Dat000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>nak@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Dat000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>nek@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Del000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ról@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Del000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ről@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ela000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ból@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ela000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ből@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ess/F:%>ként NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ess/M00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ul@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ess/M00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ül@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ill00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ba@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ill00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>be@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ine000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ban@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ine000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>ben@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ins000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>%^V2al@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ins000@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^V2el@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Nom: NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ses00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>on@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ses00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^Ö2n@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Sla00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>ra@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Sla00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>re@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Ter:%>ig NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Tra00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@:%>%^V2á@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.BACK@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;
+Tra00@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@:%>%^V2é@U.VOWEL-HARMONY.FRONT@ NOUN_PX-OR-NOT ;

LEXICON NOUN_PX-OR-NOT
@R.PX@ NOUN_PX ;
@D.PX@ # ;

LEXICON	 NOUN_PX
+PxSg1@U.PX.SG1@:0@U.PX.SG1@ # ;
+PxSg2@U.PX.SG2@:0@U.PX.SG2@ # ;
+PxSg3@U.PX.SG3@:0@U.PX.SG3@ # ;
+PxPl1@U.PX.PL1@:0@U.PX.PL1@ # ;
+PxPl2@U.PX.PL2@:0@U.PX.PL2@ # ;
+PxPl3@U.PX.PL3@:0@U.PX.PL3@ # ;


LEXICON Cases

+N+Sg+Nom:0     #   ;
+N+Sg+Acc:t    #   ;
+N+Sg+Loc:ben    #   ;

#:0   Nouns   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Proper noun inflection
!! ----------------------
!! The UNDEFINED language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON ProperNounCases
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
        -    Nouns  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON Persons
+V+1sg:en   #   ;
+V+2sg:et   #   ;
+V+3sg:e    #   ;
+V+1pl:ien  #   ;
+V+2pl:iet  #   ;
+V+3pl:iet  #   ;
+V+inf:0    #   ;
#:0   Nouns   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Adjectives
!! ----------
!! Adjectives in UNDEFINED language describe things.

LEXICON Adjectives
adjective    Comparisons   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Nouns
!! -----
!! Nouns in HUNGARIAN language are things.

LEXICON Numerals
numeral    Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Prefixes
!! --------
!! Prefixes in UNDEFINED language are bound to beginning of other words.

LEXICON Prefixes
nounprefix-     Nouns   ;
verbprefix-     Verbs   ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Pronouns
!! --------
!! Pronouns in UNDEFINED language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns
pronoun    Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

LEXICON Nouns
katoná:katoná Cases ;
lázadó:lázadó Cases ;
láz:láz Cases ;
adó:adó Cases ;
